src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
!! # Romani kale adpositions

!! ## Tags

LEXICON pr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for +Pr
+Pr: # ;

LEXICON po
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for +Po
+Po: # ;

LEXICON ad
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for +Pr and +Po
+Pr: # ;
+Po: # ;

LEXICON Adpositions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains the list
angnaal ad "edestä" ;
apo ad "-lla, -lle" ;
apraal ad "päällä" ;
apraal ad "päällä" ;
aro ad "-ssa, -Vn" ;
arreatta po "sisältä" ;
dženom ad "kautta" ;
džin ad "saakka" ;
džinom ad "kautta" ;
kajo ad "kohti" ;
maȟkar ad "keskelle" ;
maȟkaral po "keskeltä" ;
maȟkareatta po "keskeltä" ;
maȟkaresta  po "keskeltä" ;
maȟkarta  po "keskeltä" ;
naal ad "edessä, eteen" ;
naalal po "edestä" ;
naalales po "edestä" ;
naales po "edestä" ;
naalesta po "edestä" ;
neer ad "lähellä, lähelle" ;
neeresta ad "läheltä" ;
om ad "ohi" ;
paalal ad "takana" ;
paale po "takana" ;
paaleatta ad "takaa" ;
paalesta ad "takaa" ;
paȟ po "vieressä" ;
paȟal ad "vieressä" ;
paȟalesta ad "vieressä" ;
praal ad "päällä" ;
praaleetta po "päältä" ;
praalesta po "päältä" ;
prissi ad "vastaan" ;
straal ad "vuoksi" ;
teelal ad "alla" ;
teele po "alla" ;
teelealta po "alta" ;
teelesta po "alta" ;
teereatta ad "läheltä" ;
trystal ad "ympärillä" ;
trystalo ad "ympärillä" ;
uutan ad "ilman" ;
ȟaal ad "vuoksi" ;
